Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Clerk

§ 2-2-201.
Records required to be kept; probate docket; reports to be made by commissioner.

The clerk of district court in each county shall maintain a system for the recording of wills and probate including:

Proceedings of the guardianship of infants and incompetent persons;

All letters testamentary and of administration;

All inventories and records of sales of personal estate;

A general entry, claim and allowance docket.

The clerk of district court shall maintain a system for the recording of each decedent’s estate including all proceedings concerning the probate of each will, the entry of the inventory appraisement, all claims allowed, including costs of the final distribution of the estate, and the final settlement of the estate.

The clerk of court shall prepare for the use of the court a probate docket containing:

All appointments made;

All pending petitions for the sale of real estate, including the parties thereto;

All pending petitions for the release of sureties;

All pending petitions for the removal of personal representatives.

The court commissioner is bound to furnish:

The record of all reports and accounts filed;

All claims against the estate pending for trial;

All delinquencies of personal representatives to discharge any duty in the manner or within the time required by law or order of the court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4561; C.S. 1910, § 5490; C.S. 1920, § 6763; R.S. 1931, § 88-1501; C.S. 1945, § 6-107; W.S. 1957, § 2-11; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-109

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

For other provisions relating to the probate docket, see §

2-2-202

.

As to clerk of district court generally, see §§

5-3-201

to

5-3-213

.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “maintain a system” for “keep a book” and substituted “including” for “containing”; in (b), substituted “The clerk of district court shall maintain a system for the recording of” for “A separate set of books shall be kept for” and substituted “including” for “recording,” deleted “and showing” preceding “the entry,” substituted “appraisement, all claims” for “appraisement and all claims” and deleted “showing” preceding “the final settlement.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language of (c), substituted “of the court” for “of the court at each term”; in (c)(i), substituted “made” for “made in vacation”; in (d)(i), substituted “filed” for “filed in vacation”; and in (d)(ii), substituted “for trial” for “for trial at each term of court.”

Applied

in

In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961).

§ 2-2-202.
Preparation and contents of probate docket; distribution of copies; call of docket.

At least once every six (6) months, the clerk of the district court in each county of the state shall make a docket of all estates of deceased persons pending in his county which shall include:

Title of the estate;

Date of letters testamentary or letters of administration;

Name or names of the executors or administrators; and

The names of the attorneys of record.

As soon as the docket is made, one (1) copy shall be furnished to the judge of the district court of his county and one (1) copy shall be furnished upon request to each attorney of record in the estates.

The judge of the district court in each county shall, at least once every six (6) months, read the probate docket in open court and shall make an order in each estate as he deems necessary to expedite the progress and closing thereof.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 105, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 6-108; W.S. 1957, § 2-12; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-110

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “At least once every six (6) months” for “Not less than ten (10) days before the first day of the term of the district court” and in (b), substituted “at least once every six (6) months” for “upon the call of the docket after the first day of a regular term of court.”

Applied

in

In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961).

Cited

in

In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790 (Wyo. 1959).

§ 2-2-203.
Authority to approve bonds.

All bonds required by this act may be approved by the clerk of the district court wherein they are required to be filed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 28, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4563; C.S. 1910, § 5492; C.S. 1920, § 6765; R.S. 1931, § 88-1503; C.S. 1945, § 6-109; W.S. 1957, § 2-13; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-111

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to justification of sureties, see §

1-1-104

.

As to qualifications of sureties, see §

1-1-105

.

As to bond of executors and administrators generally, see §§

2-3-102

to

2-3-120

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.